Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 9. SAFETY

SUBTITLE A. PUBLIC SAFETY

CHAPTER 760. ICE SKATING CENTERS

Sec. 760.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Ice skating center" means that portion of a facility that is designed for ice skating by the public.

(2) "Operator" means a person who owns, controls, or has operational responsibility for an ice skating center.

(3) "Spectator" means an individual who is present in an ice skating center only to observe ice skating, regardless of whether the skating is recreational or competitive.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 760.002. DUTIES OF OPERATOR. An operator shall:

(1) provide at least one individual to act as a rink monitor for approximately every 200 ice skaters at any time public skating is allowed;

(2) require a rink monitor to:

(A) wear attire that identifies the individual as a rink monitor;

(B) direct and supervise skaters and spectators; and

(C) watch for and remove in a timely fashion all foreign objects that may have fallen on the ice skating surface;

(3) inspect and maintain in good condition the ice skating surface and the floors, railings, boards, and walls surrounding the ice skating surface;

(4) inspect and maintain in good mechanical condition ice skating equipment that the operator leases or rents to ice skaters;

(5) comply with the risk management guidelines for ice skating rinks endorsed by the board of directors of the Ice Skating Institute of America on August 27, 1996;

(6) post the duties of ice skaters and spectators prescribed by this chapter in conspicuous places in the ice skating center;

(7) maintain the stability and legibility of all required signs, symbols, and posted notices; and

(8) maintain liability insurance of at least $500,000 combined single limits for personal injury, death, or property damage.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 760.003. DUTIES OF ICE SKATERS. (a) An ice skater shall:

(1) comply with each posted sign or warning that relates to the behavior and responsibility of the ice skater in the ice skating center;

(2) obey instructions given by the operator, rink monitor, or other ice skating center personnel;

(3) maintain reasonable control over the speed and direction of the ice skater's skating at all times;

(4) be reasonably aware of other ice skaters or objects in the ice skating center to avoid colliding with other ice skaters or objects; and

(5) know the ice skater's ability to control the intended direction of skating and skate within the limits of that ability.

(b) An ice skater may not act in a manner that may cause injury to others.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 760.004. DUTY OF SPECTATOR. A spectator shall comply with each posted sign or warning that relates to the behavior of the spectator in the ice skating center.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 760.005. DUTY OF CHILD. In determining whether the conduct of a child violates Section 760.003 or 760.004, the conduct shall be evaluated based on the child's experience, intelligence, capacity, and age.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 760.006. LIABILITY. (a) Except for actions against an operator for gross negligence, malice, or intentional conduct, an operator is not liable in negligence for damages for personal injury, property damage, or death unless the personal injury, property damage, or death is caused by a breach of a duty prescribed in Section 760.002.

(b) Chapter 33, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, applies to an action brought against an operator.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 141, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.